California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
In a county having a population of 4,000,000 or over an owner or owners of lots or lands liable to be assessed for work may engage a registered civil engineer, registered pursuant to Chapter 7, Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, to prepare the plans for any work to be done under this division. The legislative body may purchase said plans for use in proceedings under this division and may establish rules, regulations and procedures to be followed by registered civil engineers engaged by owners in preparing plans, submitting them to and obtaining their approval by the engineer and for the time, manner and determination of the amount to be paid for such plans; provided, however, that the amount paid for plans shall not exceed 8% of the engineer’s estimate of the cost of work shown on the plans and that no payment shall be made for any plans which have not been approved by the engineer. The amount paid for any plans and any fee required to be paid, pursuant to the aforesaid rules and regulations, may be paid out of the city treasury and shall be charged against the district as an incidental expense.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1834.)
-------------------------------------------

5131.

Before ordering any work done which is authorized by this division, the legislative body shall pass a resolution of intention to do so, referring to the street by its lawful or official name, or the name by which it is commonly known. If the work is not to be done upon a public street or public way, then by briefly describing the property or right of way on which it is to be constructed, and briefly describing the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.

The resolution of intention shall be sufficient if it states in general terms the class or kinds of work contemplated, such as grading, paving, sewering and other work, and gives in general the location of the proposed work and refers to plans, profiles, detailed drawings and specifications or such of them as may be suitable or proper for the full and detailed description of the proposed work, and if it refers to any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 5103. The resolution of intention shall contain also a notice of the day, hour, and place of the public hearing where any and all persons having any objections to the proposed work or work and acquisition may appear before the legislative body and show cause why the proposed work or work and acquisition should not be carried out in accordance with the resolution of intention.

The notice shall also contain the name and telephone number of a local department or agency designated by the legislative body to answer inquiries regarding the hearing proceedings. That notice shall be omitted if the hearing of objections is not required as provided hereunder. The hearing of objections shall not be less than 45 days from the date of the passage of the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.05.

(a) If the proceedings include any acquisition and the actual cost of the acquisition as finally determined is less than the amount included in the assessment as the cost of the acquisition, the excess may be spent as the legislative body may thereafter determine, either for the maintenance or repair of the work or improvement, or the excess shall be refunded or credited in proportion to the amount of the assessments that were levied for the acquisition cost, as follows:

(1) If the assessment and all installments thereof and all interest and penalties due thereon have been paid, the refund shall be returned in cash to the person who paid the corresponding assessment or installment,
 upon furnishing satisfactory evidence of the payment.

(2) If the assessment or any installment thereof is unpaid, the credit shall be applied upon the assessment or upon the earliest unpaid installment of principal and interest.

(b) If the legislative body determines that the excess shall be used for maintenance or repair, the legislative body shall establish a separate fund of the excess and shall use it solely for that purpose.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5132.1 (as amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 506.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.1.

In addition to the notice included in the resolution of intention, the legislative body shall give notice by mail to the record owner of each identified parcel prior to levying a new or increased assessment, or an existing assessment that is subject to the procedures and approval process set forth in Section 4 of Article XIII D of the California Constitution. Each such notice shall comply with the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.2.

Each notice sent pursuant to Section 5132.1 shall contain an assessment ballot that includes that legislative body’s address for receipt of the form and a place where the person returning the assessment ballot may indicate his or her name, a reasonable identification of the parcel, and his or her support or opposition to the proposed assessment. The form of the assessment ballot shall comply with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.3.

At the time, date, and place stated in the notice mailed pursuant to Section 5132.1, the legislative body shall conduct a public hearing upon the proposed assessment in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 53753 of the Government Code. At the conclusion of the public hearing, the legislative body shall tabulate the assessment ballots submitted and not withdrawn, in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (e) of Section 53753 of the Government Code. If there is a majority protest against the imposition of a new assessment, or the extension of an existing assessment, or an increase in an existing assessment, the legislative body shall not impose, extend, or increase the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5132.4.

If the legislative body has complied with the notice, protest, and hearing provisions set forth in this article, or if the legislative body is not required to comply with those requirements because the assessment is exempt from the procedures and approval process set forth in Section 4 of Article XIIID of the California Constitution, then those requirements shall not apply in subsequent fiscal years unless the assessment methodology is changed to increase the assessment, or the amount of that assessment is proposed to exceed an assessment formula or range of assessments adopted by an agency in accordance with Article XIIID of the California Constitution or Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5133.

The clerk shall cause the resolution of intention to be published. The first publication shall be made not less than 10 days prior to the date of public hearing stated in said resolution. If the hearing of objections is not required, the first publication shall be within 10 days after the date of passage of the resolution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1833.)
-------------------------------------------

5134.

The legislative body may include in one proceeding, under one resolution of intention and in one contract, any of the different kinds of work mentioned in this division on any number of streets, properties and rights of way or portions thereof, contiguous or otherwise, and it may except therefrom any such work which has already been done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5135.

The legislative body may elect to agree to purchase, and purchase, out of the general funds of the city or any other funds eligible for such purpose, an assignment of the warrant, assessment and diagram upon delivery thereof to the contractor, pursuant to Section 5375, at the option of the contractor. Any such purchase shall be at the total amount of the several assessments upon the assessment and diagram attached to the warrant. Any such election to purchase an assignment of the warrant, assessment and diagram by the city shall be stated in the resolution of intention and in the invitation for bids. Upon the purchase of such an assignment of the warrant, assessment and diagram by the city, the city shall succeed to all rights and liens of the contractor to collect and to enforce the payment of the assessments and all bonds issued to represent said assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

5135.5.

When the contractor, at the time of execution of the contract, exercises his option to assign the warrant, assessment, and diagram to the legislative body, payments of installments may be made in the manner provided under the provisions of Section 5374.1 for installment payment of contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

5136.

As an alternative procedure for the doing of work authorized by this division, the legislative body may pass a resolution of intention to do such work containing a provision that the work shall be done if any local, state or national agency or authority accepts the proposed work as a project for which a contribution of labor, or labor and any portion of materials, supplies or equipment will be made by such agency or authority. Under such alternative procedure the work to be done by the contractor shall consist of furnishing any or all of the materials, supplies or equipment necessary for the construction of the improvement. When this alternative procedure is adopted, the resolution of intention shall so state and shall recite what contribution is to be made and by whom. The resolution of intention shall also state what work shall be done by the contractor. In all other particulars, the resolution of intention shall be the same as any resolution of intention adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5135 by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Establishment of Grade for Work [5150. - 5152.]

5150.

The provisions of this chapter relating to grades are alternative provisions and shall not repeal any other provisions of this division or of this code relating to change of grade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5150.5.

The legislative body may, by resolution, establish, change, or modify the official grade of any street, boulevard, park or place which is to be improved pursuant to this division, and the words “official grade” when used in this division shall mean the grade so established, changed, or modified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

5151.

The grade to which any work shall be done shall be that which is shown on the plans or profiles therefor or it may be done on the grade formally established by the legislative body. If any official grade has already been adopted or established for any of the streets, avenues, or other places or property proposed to be improved, it shall be lawful for the resolution of intention to provide that said work shall be done to new grades or grades different from those so established or adopted, and shall refer to plans, profiles or specifications for the description of the grade at which the work is to be done.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5152.

Any property owner whose property is to be assessed to pay the costs and expenses of the proposed work may at the time fixed in the resolution of intention for hearing of objections to the proposed work, appear before the legislative body and make objection to the proposed grade or proposed modification of grade. A failure to make objection at that time shall be deemed to be a waiver of all objections to the proposed grade or proposed change or modification of grade and shall operate as a bar to any claim for damages or any subsequent action looking to the prevention of the work or the recovery of damages on account of the performance of the work to such grade or changed grade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Work Affecting Distribution of Domestic Water Supply by Public Agencies [5170. - 5174.]

5170.

If the work proposed to be done includes the laying of conduits, pipes, hydrants, or any appliance for the supplying or distributing of a domestic water supply, and the distribution of such domestic water supply in the territory in which the work is contemplated is under the management and control of a municipal water district, a municipal utility district, a public utility district, a metropolitan water district, or any public agency other than the city ordering the work done, the conduits, pipes, hydrants, or other appurtenances for supplying or distributing such domestic water supply shall be installed under the proceedings specified in this chapter, which must be taken prior to the adoption of the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5171.

Before requiring the plans, specifications and estimates provided for in Section 5130 the legislative body shall pass a resolution requesting the public agency having charge of the supplying and distribution of the domestic water supply in the district about to be improved to furnish to the legislative body plans and specifications for adequate and appropriate conduits, pipes, hydrants and other appurtenances necessary for that purpose. It shall be the duty of such public agency to furnish the plans and specifications so required, and the plans and specifications shall be submitted to the legislative body for its approval. The cost of the preparation of such plans and specifications shall form a part of the incidental expenses of the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

5172.

The legislative body may adopt the plans and specifications furnished to it, but may not modify or change the same except with the consent of the public agency furnishing the plans and specifications. If no agreement can be reached the conduits, pipes and other appurtenances for supplying the water shall be omitted from the contemplated improvement. If the plans and specifications are adopted by the legislative body the engineer shall incorporate the plans and specifications in the plans and specifications furnished by him to the legislative body pursuant to Section 5130, and the plans and specifications shall thereupon be deemed incorporated in the plans and specifications for doing the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5173.

The public agency which supplies the plans and specifications may at all times maintain an inspector over the work to see that the plans and specifications which it has furnished have been complied with, and the cost of such inspection shall form a part of the incidental expenses of the work and be incorporated in the assessment as a part thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

5174.

After the work has been completed and accepted, title to the pipes, conduits, and other appliances for supplying or distributing water so installed shall vest in such public agency and constitute a part of its system supplying the water, and shall at all times thereafter be used, operated, maintained, and managed by it as a part of such system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Creating Assessment Districts [5180. - 5182.]

5180.

The legislative body shall make the expense of such work chargeable upon a district, which the legislative body shall, in its resolution of intention, declare to be the district benefited by the work, and to be assessed to pay the cost and expense thereof. The territory comprising said district may, but need not, include all, or be confined to, or extend beyond, the lots or lands fronting upon the improvement, or be contiguous, and the district may consist of separate and distinct areas or sections. The work performed in one section need not benefit the other section or sections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5181.

The district may be described by:

(a) Stating its exterior boundaries; or

(b) Giving a description thereof according to any official or recorded map; or 

(c) Referring to a plat or map on file in the office of the clerk or engineer at the time of passing the resolution of intention, which shall indicate by a boundary line the extent of the territory included in the proposed district, and shall govern for all details as to the extent of the assessment district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1950, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

5182.

The assessment district need not be described in any of the notices, resolutions, orders or determinations provided for in this division, other than the resolution of intention. Any description of said district in any of the same shall be sufficient, if it refers to the resolution of intention for a description of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1093.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Notice of Improvement [5194. - 5198.]

5194.

The legislative body shall appoint the time and place of the hearing on the resolution of intention and shall cause notice of that hearing and the public meeting required by Section 54954.6 of the Government Code to be mailed as provided in subdivision (c) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1194, Sec. 7.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5196.

If the doing of the work requires a change of grade of any railroad track or tracks, the legislative body shall direct the clerk to mail to the owner or reputed owner or operator or reputed operator thereof, at its last known address as the same appears on the tax rolls of the city, the legislative body of which is conducting the proceeding, or when no address so appears then to such owner or operator in care of general delivery in such city and to the Public Utilities Commission, printed copies of the resolution of intention within five days after the first publication thereof. Failure to mail said copies or failure of any such owner or operator to receive the same or any erroneous address thereon shall not affect the jurisdiction of the legislative body, but in such event the failure of the owner or operator of such tracks to make objection to the proposed grades shall not be deemed to be a waiver of all objections to the proposed grades or proposed change or modification of grade, nor operate as a bar to any claim for damages, if recoverable damages there be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

5198.

This chapter shall not apply if the hearing of objections is not required pursuant to Section 5132.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1833.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Protest and Hearing [5221.5. - 5227.]

5221.5.

In lieu of hearing and passing upon protests as provided in Section 5221, the legislative body may continue the hearing of protests to a day certain and refer the protests to the superintendent of streets for investigation, report and recommendation as to the improvement and matters included in the protests. The report and recommendation of the superintendent of streets shall be in writing, and a copy thereof shall be mailed not less than five days prior to the continued hearing date for protests to each person owning property liable to be assessed who has made a written protest. At the time set for the continued hearing the legislative body shall hear and pass upon the report and recommendation of the superintendent of streets and its decision shall be final. The legislative body may adjourn the hearing from time to time. Protests may be withdrawn in the same manner as provided in Section 5221.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1402.)
-------------------------------------------

5223.

If it shall be necessary, in order to find whether a majority protest exists, to determine whether any or all of the signers of written protests are the “owners” of property to be assessed, the legislative body shall make such determination from the last equalized assessment roll, any written evidence submitted with a written protest and any other evidence received at the hearing. The legislative body shall be under no duty to obtain or consider any other evidence as to ownership of property and its determination of ownership shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 418.)
-------------------------------------------

5225.

If no protests or objections in writing have been delivered to the clerk up to the hour set for the hearing thereon or if protests have been found by the legislative body to be insufficient, or have been overruled, or if protests against the extent of the proposed district have been heard and denied, immediately thereupon the legislative body shall acquire jurisdiction to order the proposed work to be done.

If the hearing of objections is not required, pursuant to Section 5132, immediately upon passage of the resolution of intention the legislative body shall acquire jurisdiction to order the proposed work to be done.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1833.)
-------------------------------------------

5227.

Nothing in this act contained shall prohibit the legislative body, within said one-year period referred to in Section 5222 hereof, from commencing and carrying on new proceedings for the construction of a portion of the improvement so protested against if it finds, by the affirmative vote of four-fifths of its members, that the owners of a majority of the property within the area of the assessment district to be established under said new proceedings are in favor of going forward with said portion of the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. General Provisions Relating to Assessments [5300. - 5305.]

5300.

Whenever a railroad, street, or interurban railroad right-of-way shall be included within any district to be assessed for the cost of any work provided in this division, such railroad right-of-way (whether it is owned in fee or as an easement) shall be included in the warrant, assessment, and diagram. Such railroad right-of-way shall be assessed only if, and to the extent that, it is found that it will benefit from the proposed improvement, and such railroad, street, or interurban railroad right-of-way shall be subject to sale for nonpayment of assessments as provided in this division. In determining whether or not such railroad right-of-way benefits its use as a right-of-way for a railroad shall be presumed to be permanent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1292.)
-------------------------------------------

5301.

If a lot or parcel of land belonging to the United States, or to the state, or to a county, city, public agent, mandatory of the government, school board, educational, penal or reform institution, or facility for the housing of persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities or mental health disorders is in use in the performance of a public function, and is included within the district to be assessed to pay the costs and expenses thereof, the legislative body may, in the resolution of intention, declare that the lots or parcels of land, or any of them, shall be omitted from the assessment thereafter to be made to cover the costs and expenses of the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 52.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

If any such lots or parcels of land are omitted from the assessment, the total expense of all work done shall be assessed on the remaining lots or parcels of land lying within the limits of the assessment district, without regard to such omitted lots or parcels of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.5.

If the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, declares that any lot or parcel of land owned and used as provided in Section 5301 shall be included in the assessment, or if no declaration is made respecting any such lot or parcel of land then any assessment upon such lot or parcel of land shall be an enforceable obligation against the owner of such property and shall be paid, within 30 days after the date of recording the assessment, by the officer, officers, or board having charge of the disbursement of the funds of the owner of such lot or parcel of land and, if not paid within said 30 days, shall bear interest until paid at the rate stated in the resolution of intention for the bonds proposed to be issued, and if no bonds are proposed to be issued then at the rate of not more than 7 percent per annum until paid; provided, however, that if said assessment is not paid within said 30-day period the city may, and if the city has so provided in its resolution of intention shall, at the expiration thereof, forthwith advance the necessary sum and pay the assessment and shall collect the amount of said assessment and interest thereon from the said obligated owner and may enforce the collection thereof by writ of mandate or other proper remedy. If for any reason there are not moneys available for the payment of said assessment, then the legislative body of the public entity which owns said property so assessed may elect to cause said assessment to be payable in a number of installments not to exceed the number of installments of and at the same interest rate as bonds issued in the proceedings creating the assessment, or if no bonds are to be issued, for a number of installments not to exceed the number of installments of annual payments as provided by Section 6462 of this code for payment of bonds issued under the provisions of this division and for a rate of interest to be specified. In the event the legislative body of the entity whose property is assessed decides that said assessment shall be payable in installments, then the officer, officers or board whose duty it is to levy taxes for said obligated owner, including school districts but not limited thereto, shall include in the next tax levy an amount, in addition to moneys for all other purposes, sufficient to pay the annual installment of principal and interest upon said assessment with interest on the unpaid principal of the assessment to date of the payments, and shall include in each succeeding tax levy a like amount or more, in addition to moneys for all other purposes, until the principal of said assessment and all interest on unpaid portions thereof, shall be paid in full. In the event the officer, officers, or board whose duty it is to levy taxes fails to discharge the principal of the assessment and the interest thereon, the owner of the assessment may compel the levy thereof in the manner hereinabove set forth by writ of mandate. No statute of limitations shall bar any right provided for herein to enforce the collection of an assessment of the type described herein and any interest due thereon until four years after the due date of the last principal payment due upon said assessment. The owner of an assessment described herein may use mandamus or other appropriate remedy to compel the officer, officers or board whose duty it is to levy taxes for said obligated owner to levy an amount in a given year equal to the amount necessary to pay the installment of principal and interest on the assessment in said year, and may continue to use mandamus or other remedy to cause like installments of the amount of principal and interest accruing to be levied each year until the whole of the assessment due has been paid.

If the owner of an assessment is successful in any action to compel the levy of a tax under this section he shall be awarded reasonable attorneys’ fees as fixed by the court and costs and said attorneys’ fees and costs shall be included in said tax levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.6.

As an alternative method to that method provided in Sections 5302.5 and 6467, for financing unpaid assessments against publicly owned property, as such property is defined in Section 5301, bonds may be issued to represent unpaid assessments against such public property. Bonds shall be issued in the manner and form as provided for in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 6468), Part 5 of this division. The holders of such bonds and each individual holder of such bonds shall have all of the rights set forth for the holder of an assessment under Section 5302.5 and that of the owner of a certificate to represent assessment against public property as provided for in this code and other rights as provided by the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 6468), Part 5 of this division. If bonds are to be issued to represent assessments against publicly owned property, it may be set forth by resolution of the legislative body of the entity conducting the proceedings at any time prior to the levy of assessment in the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 770.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

If the legislative body, in the resolution of intention, declares that any lot or parcel of land used as provided in Section 5301 and owned by the United States or any department thereof or the State of California or any department thereof shall be included in the assessment, then the city shall be liable for such sum as may thereafter be assessed against such lot or parcel of land and which is unpaid after 30 days from the recordation of the assessment. Such sum shall be payable by the city out of the general fund unless the legislative body shall in its resolution of intention designate another fund. The foregoing provisions of this section shall not apply to any assessment pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 5320) of Part 3 of this division against any such land owned by the State of California or department thereof, but the city shall advance the amount of any such assessment in such assessment proceedings and shall in such case become the owner of such assessment and entitled to repayment of such amount with interest thereon at the rate provided in that chapter from the State of California or any department thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 194, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5305.

The legislative body may provide for deferral of payment of assessments in accordance with procedures prescribed by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 10700) of Division 12.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   Effective July 22, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Assessment of Property Owned by the State of California [5320. - 5325.]

5320.

Notwithstanding the terms and provisions of any other section of this division, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to and govern the assessment of property owned by the State of California or any department thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1219.)
-------------------------------------------

5321.

All real property acquired by the State of California or any department thereof is property subject to assessment in proceedings conducted under this division, except real property which is acquired prior to the filing in the office of the county recorder of a copy of the map of the assessment district pursuant to Section 3111 and which is located within the right-of-way of a state highway or proposed state highway. For the purposes of this section, property shall be deemed to have been acquired upon the vesting of title, or the filing of a condemnation action, whichever occurs first. The local agency shall notify the Department of Transportation of any proceedings or hearings to be held relative to the establishment of a map of the assessment district pursuant to Section 3111.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 105.)
-------------------------------------------

5322.

The State of California or any department thereof that has jurisdiction over any real property subject to assessment as provided in this chapter shall pay the amount of money assessed against such real property together with any interest as herein provided. If the State of California or the department thereof having jurisdiction of the real property does not pay the amount of money so assessed against such property on or before the end of the second fiscal year following the date when the notice of assessment is recorded pursuant to Section 3114, the owner of such assessment shall, within six months after the end of the second fiscal year, have the right to file a claim against the State of California in the manner provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 900) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 910) of Part 3 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and neither any provision of those chapters nor any statute of limitation nor any other statutory provision shall bar the filing of such a claim within such six-months’ period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1219.)
-------------------------------------------

5323.

The State of California or any department thereof having jurisdiction over any real property subject to assessment as provided in this chapter shall have the same right provided for in this division or other applicable law to pay the amount of money assessed against such real property without interest as does a private person owning property assessed under this division or such other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1219.)
-------------------------------------------

5324.

Neither the State of California nor any department thereof that has jurisdiction over any real property assessed, as herein provided, shall be obligated to make payment thereof until the Legislature has appropriated the amount necessary to make payment of such assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1219.)
-------------------------------------------

5325.

If the State of California or such department thereof does not pay the amount of money assessed within 30 days after the effective date of the legislation making the appropriation to pay the assessment, the amount of money assessed shall bear interest at the rate of 6 percent per annum until paid, commencing with the 31st day after the effective date of such appropriation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1219.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14.5. Assessments of Indian-Owned Property [5330. - 5335.]

5330.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the provisions of this chapter shall apply to, and govern the assessment of, Indian-owned property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 970.)
-------------------------------------------

5331.

As used in this chapter, “Indian-owned property” means any tax exempt trust property to which an American Indian has rights as determined by federal laws, as administered by the Bureau of Indian Affairs of the Department of Interior.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 970.)
-------------------------------------------

5332.

Whenever Indian-owned property is leased, and a possessory interest is created thereby, the leasehold interest may be subject to assessment in proceedings conducted under this division. In such instances, the city shall first obtain the written consent of the Bureau of Indian Affairs, the owner of the underlying fee, and any owner of an existing prior recorded possessory interest in the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 970.)
-------------------------------------------

5333.

Any such assessment shall be secured by an assignment to the city of the possessory interest which shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 970.)
-------------------------------------------

5334.

When bonds are to be issued to represent unpaid assessments against a possessory interest created by a lease in Indian-owned property, the term of the lease remaining at the time of issuance shall exceed, by at least 15 years, the term of the bonds issued.

If bonds are to be issued to represent assessments against such a possessory interest, the legislative body shall so declare in the resolution of intention.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 970.)
-------------------------------------------

5335.

All notices required by this division to be given to the owner of property subject to an assessment, shall be given to the fee owner, the owner of an existing prior recorded possessory interest, and the assignor of the possessory interest created by a lease. The notices shall refer to the possessory interest against which the assessment is made.

Where the provisions of this division otherwise require any notice or documents to refer to the property subject to assessment, the notice or document shall refer instead to the possessory interest and shall contain a legal description of the possessory interest created by the lease on such property. If the legal description of the possessory interest describes an area less than the entire property ownership, the notice or document shall also contain a reference to the record of the acquisition instrument to the entire parcel from which the possessory interest was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 970.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. District Assessments [5341. - 5344.]

5341.

The engineer shall prior to completion of the contract make a diagram of the property affected or benefited by the proposed work, as described in the resolution of intention, which is to be assessed to pay the costs and expenses thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 416.)
-------------------------------------------

5342.

The diagram shall show each separate lot or parcel of land within the limits of the assessment district, and the dimensions of each such lot or parcel of land, and the relative location of the same to the work proposed to be done.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 625.)
-------------------------------------------

5343.
